Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1589.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 941, as
amended by Section 226, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 941), is amended to read as follows:
Section 941. A. For purposes of this section:
1. “Online casino games” means any gambling game that allows a
person to access the Internet, World Wide Web, or any part thereof
by way of a computer, computer system, computer network, computer
software, computer terminal, or similar device including, but not
limited to, a cellular or mobile telephone, a smart or electronic
watch, or a tablet that, upon risking any representative of value,
simulates any gambling game described in this section or any other
form of gambling including, but not limited to, a slot machine as
defined in Section 964 of this title, a lottery as defined in
subsection A of Section 1051 of this title, a bingo game or U-PIK-EM
bingo game as defined in paragraphs 1 and 22 of Section 402 of Title
3A of the Oklahoma Statutes, or any prohibited game as described in

subsection H of Section 262 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
and
2. “Representative of value” includes any and all currency used
as part of a dual-currency system of payment that allows a person to
exchange such currency for any prize, award, cash, or cash
equivalent, or any chance to win any prize, award, cash, or cash
equivalent.
B. Except as provided in the Oklahoma Charity Games Act or as
otherwise authorized to be conducted on Indian lands in compliance
with the Indian Gaming Regulatory Act, 25 U.S.C., Section 2701 et
seq., every person who opens, or causes to be opened, or who
conducts, whether for hire or not, or carries on either poker,
roulette, craps, or any banking or percentage, or any gambling game
played with dice, cards, or any device including, but not limited
to, online casino games, for money, checks, credits, or any
representatives of value, or who either as owner or employee,
geolocation provider, gaming supplier, platform provider, promoter,
or media affiliate, whether for hire or not, deals or provides
support for those engaged in any such game, shall be guilty of a
Class C2 felony offense, and upon conviction thereof, shall be
punished by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00),
nor more than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00), and by imprisonment
as provided for in subsections B through F E of Section 20M of this
title.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1589 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 2nd day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 4th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1589 Page 3